New York, session 2025-2026, S6171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this act: 2 (a) "Municipal corporation" shall mean any municipality with a popu- 3 lation greater than sixty thousand. 4 (b) "Neighborhood" shall have the same meaning as "neighborhood unit" 5 as defined in section 2 of the private housing finance law. 6 § 2. The New York state energy research and development authority is 7 authorized and directed to study the feasibility, efficiency, and energy 8 saving costs for municipalities if individuals' homes or neighborhoods 9 were to create their own independent micro-grids. Such study shall 10 include, but not be limited to: 11 (a) the cost of constructing a micro-grid to power independent neigh- 12 borhoods and homes; 13 (b) the feasibility of constructing a micro-grid for neighborhoods and 14 homes; 15 (c) the efficiency of a micro-grid for neighborhoods and homes; 16 (d) the cost of operations to run a micro-grid for neighborhoods and 17 homes; 18 (e) the potential effects of independent micro-grids for neighborhoods 19 and homes lessening the stress on current electrical systems; and 20 (f) the potential cost savings of independent micro-grids. 21 § 3. The New York state energy research and development authority 22 shall make a report to the governor and the legislature of its findings, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07289-02-5 S. 6171--A 2 1 conclusions, and recommendations no later than seven months after the 2 effective date of this act and shall submit with this report such legis- 3 lative proposals as it deems necessary to implement its recommendations. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.